de: Spiegelkrümmung: Konkav; Konvex; Flach; Sonstiges
da: Spejlkrumning: Konkav; Konveks; Flad; Andet
ro-RO: Curbura oglinzii: Concav; Convex; Plat; Altele
bg-BG: Кривина на огледалото: Вдлъбнато; Изпъкнало; Плоско; Друго
sv: Spegelns kurvatur: Konkav; Konvex; Platt; Övrigt
nb: Speilkrumning: Konkav; Konveks; Flat; Annet
zh-TW: 鏡面曲率: 凹面; 凸面; 平面; 其他
tr: Ayna eğriliği: İçbükey; Dışbükey; Düz; Diğer
pl: Krzywizna lustra: Wklęsłe; Wypukłe; Płaskie; Pozostałe
cs: Zakřivení zrcadla: Konkávní; Konvexní; Ploché; Jiné
ja: 鏡の曲率: 凹型; 凸型; フラット; その他
ru: Кривизна зеркала: Вогнутое; Выпуклое; Плоское; Другое
hu: Tükör görbülete: Homorú; Konvex; Lapos; Egyéb
it: Curvatura dello specchio: Concavo; Convessa; Piatto; Altro
nl: Spiegelkromming: Concaaf; Convex; Vlak; Overig
th: ความโค้งของกระจก: เว้า; โค้งนูน; เรียบ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Zakrivljenost zrcala: Konkavan; Konveksan; Ravna; Ostalo
fr: Courbure du miroir: Concave; Convexe; Plat; Autre
sk-SK: Zakrivenie zrkadla: Konkávne; Konvexné; Rovné; Iné
ko: 거울 곡률: 오목형; 볼록한; 플랫; 기타
en: Mirror curvature: Concave; Convex; Flat; Other
el: Καμπυλότητα καθρέφτη: Κοίλο; Κυρτό; Επίπεδο; Άλλο
fi: Peilin kaarevuus: Kovera; Kupera; Tasainen; Muu
lt-LT: Veidrodžio išgaubtumas: Įgaubtas; Įgaubta; Plokščias; Kita
sl-SI: Ukrivljenost zrcala: Vbočen; Konveksno; Ploščata; Druga
pt-PT: Curvatura do espelho: Côncavo; Convexo; Plano; Outro
zh-CN: 镜面曲率: 凹形; 凸面; 平面; 其他
pt-BR: Curvatura do espelho: Côncavo; Convexo; Plano; Outro
es: Curvatura del espejo: Cóncavo; Convexo; Plano; Otros
vi: Độ cong của gương: Lõm; Lồi; Phẳng; Khác